North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-58 Urban Renewal Law

40-58-01.
Short title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 19.

40-58-01.1.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Area of operation” means the area within the corporate limits of the municipality and the area within five miles [8.05 kilometers] of those limits, except that the term does not include any area that lies within the territorial boundaries of another incorporated city unless a resolution is adopted by the governing body of the other city declaring a need for the inclusion.

“Blighted area” means an area other than a slum area which by reason of the presence of a substantial number of slums, deteriorated or deteriorating structures, predominance of defective or inadequate street layout, faulty lot layout in relation to size, adequacy, accessibility, or usefulness, unsanitary or unsafe conditions, deterioration of site or other improvements, diversity of ownership, tax or special assessment delinquency exceeding the fair value of the land, defective or unusual conditions of title, improper subdivision or obsolete platting, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of these factors, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of a municipality, retards the provision of housing accommodations or constitutes an economic or social liability and is a menace to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare in its present condition and use. “Blighted area” does not include any land that has been assessed as agricultural property within the last ten years unless it was located within the interior boundaries of a city for at least ten years.

“Board” or “commission” means a board, commission, department, division, office, body, or other unit of the municipality.

“Bonds” means any bonds, including refunding bonds, notes, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness, debentures, or other obligations.

“Clerk” means the clerk or other official of a municipality who is the custodian of the official records of the municipality.

“Development” includes the construction of new buildings, structures, or improvements; the demolition, alteration, remodeling, repair, or reconstruction of existing buildings, structures, or improvements; the acquisition of equipment; and the clearing and grading of land on industrial or commercial property in a development or renewal area. However, for the purpose of determining amounts to be reimbursed by tax increments under section 40-58-20, only those eligible public costs of development enumerated under section 40-58-20.1 are reimbursable for that purpose.

“Development or renewal area” means industrial or commercial property, a slum or blighted area, or a combination of these properties or areas that the local governing body designates as appropriate for a development or renewal project.

“Development or renewal plan” means a plan for a development or renewal project which:

Conforms to the general plan for the municipality as a whole; and

Is sufficiently complete to indicate any land acquisition, development, demolition and removal of structures, redevelopment, improvements, or rehabilitation as may be proposed to be carried out in the development or renewal area, zoning and planning changes, if any, land uses, maximum densities, building requirements, and the plan’s relationship to definite local objectives relating to appropriate land uses, improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities, and other public improvements.

“Development or renewal project” may include authorized undertakings or activities of a municipality in a development or renewal area for the development of commercial or industrial property or for the elimination and prevention of the development or spread of slums and blight.

“Dwelling” means any building, or structure, or part of a building or structure used and occupied for human habitation or intended to be so used, and includes any appurtenances to the building or structure.

“Federal government” means the United States or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States.

“Governing body” means the city council, the board of city commissioners, or the board of township supervisors.

“Housing authority” means a housing authority created by and established pursuant to the housing authorities law.

“Industrial or commercial property” means unused or underutilized real property that is zoned or used as an industrial or commercial site.

“Mayor” means the mayor of a municipality or other officer or body having the duties customarily imposed upon the executive head of a municipality.

“Municipality” means any incorporated city in the state.

“Obligee” includes any bondholder, agents or trustees for any bondholder, or lessor demising to the municipality property used in connection with a development or renewal project, or any assignee or assignees of the lessor’s interest or any part thereof, and the federal government when it is a party to any contract with the municipality.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, company, association, joint-stock association, or body politic and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or other person acting in a similar representative capacity.

“Public body” means the state or any municipality, township, board, commission, authority, district, or any other political subdivision or public body of the state.

“Public officer” means any officer who is in charge of any department or branch of the government of the municipality relating to health, fire, building regulations, or to other activities concerning dwellings in the municipality.

“Real property” includes all lands, including improvements and fixtures on the land, and property of any nature appurtenant to the land, or used in connection with the land, and every estate, interest, right and use, legal or equitable, in the land, including terms for years and liens by way of judgment, mortgage, or otherwise.

“Rehabilitation” or “conservation” includes the restoration and renewal of all or a part of a slum or blighted area, in accordance with a development or renewal plan, by:

Carrying out plans for a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings or other improvements.

Acquisition of real property and demolition or removal of buildings and improvements on the real property if necessary to eliminate unhealthful, unsanitary, or unsafe conditions, lessen density, reduce traffic hazards, eliminate obsolete or other uses detrimental to the public welfare, or to otherwise remove or prevent the spread of blight or deterioration, or to provide land for needed public facilities.

Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out the purposes of this chapter.

The disposition of any property acquired in the development or renewal area, including sale, initial leasing, or retention by the municipality at its fair value for uses in accordance with the development or renewal plan.

“Slum area” means an area in which there is a predominance of buildings or improvements, whether residential or nonresidential, which by reason of dilapidation, deterioration, age or obsolescence, inadequate provision for ventilation, light, air, sanitation, or open spaces, high density of population and overcrowding, or the existence of conditions which endanger life or property by fire and other causes, or any combination of these factors is conducive to ill health, transmission of disease, infant mortality, juvenile delinquency, or crime, and is detrimental to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare.

“Slum clearance and redevelopment” may include:

Acquisition of all or part of a slum area or a blighted area.

Demolition and removal of buildings and improvements.

Installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other improvements necessary for carrying out the development or renewal plan.

Making the land available for development or redevelopment by private enterprise or public agencies, including sale, initial leasing, or retention by the municipality at its fair value for uses in accordance with the development or renewal plan.

“Urban renewal agency” means a public agency created pursuant to section 40-58-16.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 2; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 2011, ch. 300, § 1.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 300, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

40-58-02.
Findings and declarations of necessity.

It is hereby found and declared that there exist in municipalities of the state slum and blighted areas which constitute a serious and growing menace, injurious to the public health, safety, morals, and welfare of the residents of the state; that the existence of these areas contributes substantially and increasingly to the spread of disease and crime, constitutes an economic and social liability, substantially impairs or arrests the sound growth of municipalities, retards the provision of housing accommodations, aggravates traffic problems, and substantially impairs or arrests the elimination of traffic hazards and the improvement of traffic facilities; and that the prevention and elimination of slums and blight is a matter of state policy and state concern in order that the state and its municipalities do not continue to be endangered by areas which are focal centers of disease, promote juvenile delinquency, and, while contributing little to the tax income of the state and its municipalities, consume an excessive proportion of its revenues because of the extra services required for police, fire, accident, hospitalization, and other forms of public protection, services, and facilities. It is further found and declared that certain slum or blighted areas, or portions thereof, may require acquisition, clearance, and disposition subject to use restrictions, as provided in this chapter, since the prevailing condition of decay may make impracticable the reclamation of the area by conservation or rehabilitation; that other areas or portions thereof may, through the means provided in this chapter, be susceptible of conservation or rehabilitation in such a manner that the conditions and evils described in this section may be eliminated, remedied, or prevented; and that to the extent feasible salvable slum and blighted areas should be conserved and rehabilitated through voluntary action and the regulatory process.

It is further found and declared that there exist in municipalities of the state conditions of unemployment, underemployment, and joblessness detrimental to the economic growth of the state economy; that it is appropriate to implement economic development programs both desirable and necessary to eliminate the causes of unemployment, underemployment, and joblessness for the benefit of the state economy; and that tax increment financing is an economic development program designed to facilitate projects that create economic growth and development.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5802; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 3; 2007, ch. 293, § 27.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 27 of chapter 293, S.L. 2007 became effective April 5, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 47 of chapter 293, S.L. 2007.

40-58-03.
Encouragement of private enterprise.

A municipality, to the greatest extent it determines to be feasible in carrying out this chapter, shall afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, to the development, rehabilitation, or redevelopment of the development or renewal area by private enterprise. A municipality shall give consideration to this objective in exercising its powers under this chapter, including the formulation of a workable program, the approval of development or renewal plans consistent with the general plan for the municipality, the adoption and enforcement of ordinances as provided for in section 40-58-18, the exercise of its zoning powers, the enforcement of other laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements, the disposition of any property acquired, and the provision of necessary public improvements.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5803; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 4.

40-58-04.
Workable program.

A municipality for the purposes of this chapter may formulate a workable program for utilizing appropriate private and public resources, including those specified in section 40-58-18, to facilitate the development of industrial or commercial properties, eliminate and prevent the development or spread of slums and urban blight, encourage needed urban rehabilitation, provide for the redevelopment of slum and blighted areas, or undertake these activities or other feasible municipal activities as may be suitably employed to achieve the objectives of the workable program. The workable program may include provision for:

The development of industrial or commercial properties;

The prevention of the spread of blight into areas of the municipality which are free from blight through diligent enforcement of housing, zoning, and occupancy controls and standards;

The rehabilitation or conservation of slum and blighted areas or portions of those areas by replanning, removing congestion, providing parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements, by encouraging voluntary rehabilitation and by compelling the repair and rehabilitation of deteriorated or deteriorating structures; and

The clearance and redevelopment of slum areas or portions of those areas.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5804; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 5.

40-58-05.
Finding of necessity by governing body.

A municipality may not exercise any of the powers conferred upon municipalities by this chapter until its governing body adopts a resolution finding that:

One or more slum or blighted areas or industrial or commercial properties exist in the municipality; and

The development, rehabilitation, conservation, or redevelopment, or a combination thereof, of the area or properties is necessary in the interest of the public economy, health, safety, morals, or welfare of the residents of the municipality.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5805; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 6.

40-58-06.
Preparation, adoption, and revision of development or renewal plans.

A municipality may not approve a development or renewal plan for a development or renewal area unless the governing body by resolution determines that the area is a slum or blighted area or consists of industrial or commercial property, or a combination of those areas or properties, and designates the area or properties as appropriate for a development or renewal project. The local governing body may not approve a development or renewal plan until a general plan for the municipality is prepared. For this purpose and other municipal purposes, a municipality may prepare, adopt, and revise a general plan for the physical development of the municipality as a whole giving due regard to the environs and metropolitan surroundings, establish and maintain a planning commission for this purpose and related municipal planning activities, and make available and appropriate necessary funds for these purposes. A municipality may not acquire real property for a development or renewal project unless the governing body approves the development or renewal plan in accordance with subsection 4.

The municipality may prepare or cause to be prepared a development or renewal plan, or any person or agency, public or private, may submit a development or renewal plan to a municipality. Prior to its approval of a development or renewal plan, the governing body shall submit the plan to the planning commission of the municipality, if any, for review and recommendations as to its conformity with the general plan for the development of the municipality as a whole. However, if the development or renewal plan relates only to proposed development of industrial or commercial property, the governing body is not required to submit the plan to the planning commission unless the proposed development is not consistent with the comprehensive city plan. The planning commission shall submit its written recommendations with respect to the proposed development or renewal plan to the governing body within thirty days after receipt of the plan for review. Upon receipt of the recommendations of the planning commission, or if no recommendations are received within the thirty-day period, the governing body may proceed with the hearing on the proposed development or renewal plan prescribed by subsection 3.

The governing body shall hold a public hearing on a development or renewal plan or substantial modification of an approved plan, after public notice of the hearing is provided by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation of the municipality. The notice must describe the time, date, place, and purpose of the hearing, generally identify the development or renewal area covered by the plan, and outline the general scope of the development or renewal project under consideration.

Following the hearing, the governing body may approve a development or renewal plan if it finds that:

A feasible method exists for the location of families who will be displaced from the development or renewal area in decent, safe, and sanitary dwelling accommodations within their means and without undue hardship to those families;

The development or renewal plan conforms to the general plan of the municipality as a whole; and

The development or renewal plan will afford maximum opportunity, consistent with the sound needs of the municipality as a whole, for the development, rehabilitation, or redevelopment of the development or renewal area by private enterprise.

A development or renewal plan may be modified at any time; provided, that if modified after the lease or sale by the municipality of real property in the development or renewal project area, the modification is subject to the rights at law or in equity as a lessee or purchaser, or the lessee’s or purchaser’s successor or successors in interest, is entitled to assert. Any proposed modification which will substantially change the development or renewal plan as previously approved by the governing body is subject to the requirements of this section, including the requirement of a public hearing, before it may be approved.

Upon the approval of a development or renewal plan by the municipality, the provisions of the plan governing the future use and building requirements applicable to the property covered by the plan control the future use of and building on the property.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 6; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5806; S.L. 1965 Sp., ch. 6, § 1; 1989, ch. 499, § 7.

40-58-07.
Powers.

A municipality has all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the power:

To authorize or undertake and carry out development or renewal projects within its area of operation; to make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient to the exercise of its powers under this chapter; and to disseminate industrial or commercial development, slum clearance, and urban renewal information.

To provide, arrange, or contract for the furnishing or repair by any person or agency, public or private, of services, privileges, works, streets, roads, public utilities, or other facilities for or in connection with a development or renewal project; to install, construct, and reconstruct streets, utilities, parks, playgrounds, and other public improvements; and to agree to any conditions that it may deem reasonable and appropriate attached to federal financial assistance and imposed pursuant to federal law relating to the determination of prevailing salaries or wages or compliance with labor standards, in the undertaking or carrying out of a development or renewal project, and to include in any contract let in connection with the project, provisions to fulfill those conditions as it may deem reasonable and appropriate.

Within its area of operation, to enter upon any building or property in any development or renewal area in order to make surveys, appraisals, soundings, or test borings, and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted; to acquire by purchase, lease, option, gift, grant, bequest, devise, or otherwise, any real property or personal property for its administrative purposes together with any property improvements; to hold, improve, clear, or prepare for development or redevelopment any such property; to mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, or otherwise encumber or dispose of any real property; to insure or provide for the insurance of any real or personal property or operations of the municipality against any risks or hazards, including the power to pay premiums for the insurance; and to enter into any contracts necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter; provided, however, that no statutory provision with respect to the acquisition, clearance, or disposition of property by public bodies restricts a municipality or other public body exercising powers under this subsection, in the exercise of those functions with respect to a development or renewal project, unless the legislative assembly shall specifically so state.

To invest development or renewal project funds held in reserves or sinking funds, or any of those funds not required for immediate disbursement, in property or securities in which savings banks may legally invest funds subject to their control; to redeem bonds issued pursuant to section 40-58-10 at the established redemption price or to purchase bonds at less than redemption price, all bonds so redeemed or purchased to be canceled.

To borrow money and to apply for and accept advances, loans, grants, contributions, and any other form of financial assistance from the federal government, the state, county, or other public body, or from any sources, public or private, for the purposes of this chapter, and to give such security as may be required and to enter into and carry out contracts in connection therewith. A municipality may include in any contract for financial assistance with the federal government for a development or renewal project any conditions imposed pursuant to federal law as the municipality may deem reasonable and appropriate and which are not inconsistent with the purposes of this chapter.

Within its area of operation, to make or cause to have made all plans necessary to the carrying out of the purposes of this chapter and to contract with any person, public or private, in making and carrying out those plans and to adopt or approve, modify, and amend those plans. The plans may include:

A general plan for the locality as a whole.

Development or renewal plans.

Plans for carrying out a program of voluntary or compulsory repair and rehabilitation of buildings and improvements.

Plans for the enforcement of state and local laws, codes, and regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of buildings and improvements and to the compulsory repair, rehabilitation, demolition, or removal of buildings and improvements.

Appraisals, title searches, surveys, studies, and other preliminary plans and work necessary to prepare for the undertaking of development or renewal projects. The municipality may develop, test, and report methods and techniques, and carry out demonstrations and other activities, for the prevention and the elimination of slums and urban blight, and to apply for, accept, and utilize grants of funds from the federal government for such purposes.

To prepare plans and provide reasonable assistance for the relocation of families displaced from a development or renewal area.

To appropriate funds and make expenditures that are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and to levy taxes within the limitations of the capital improvements fund under section 57-15-38 and to levy assessments for those purposes; to close, vacate, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; to plan or replan or zone or rezone any part of the municipality or make exceptions from building regulations; and to enter into agreements with a housing authority or an urban renewal agency vested with urban renewal project powers under section 40-58-15, which agreements may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary, respecting action to be taken by the municipality pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter.

Within its area of operation, to organize, coordinate, and direct the administration of this chapter as those provisions apply to the municipality in order that the objectives of remedying slum and blighted areas and preventing the causes of those areas and facilitating the development of industrial or commercial properties within the municipality may be most effectively promoted and achieved, and to establish new offices of the municipality or to reorganize existing offices in order to carry out that purpose most effectively.

To exercise all or any part or combination of the powers granted by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 7; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5807; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 8; 2007, ch. 293, § 28; 2015, ch. 439, § 58, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 58 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 28 of chapter 293, S.L. 2007 became effective April 5, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 47 of chapter 293, S.L. 2007.

Subdivision 8.

—Payment of Special Assessments.

By giving an urban renewal agency the power to levy and collect taxes the legislature impliedly authorized the payment of special assessments due thereon by the agency. Southwest Fargo Urban Renewal Agency v. Lenthe, 149 N.W.2d 373, 1967 N.D. LEXIS 139 (N.D. 1967).

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance providing for repair or destruction of residential building by public authorities at owner’s expense, 43 A.L.R.3d 916.

40-58-08.
Eminent domain. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 293, § 46.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by
section 46 of chapter 293, S.L. 2007 became effective April 5, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in
section 47 of chapter 293, S.L. 2007.

40-58-09.
Disposal of property in development or renewal area.

A municipality may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest in real property acquired by it, and may enter into contracts with respect to the real property, in a development or renewal area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use, or may retain the property or interest for public use, in accordance with the development or renewal plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions, including covenants running with the land, as it may deem to be necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or spread of future slums or blighted areas, to facilitate the development of industrial or commercial properties, or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter; provided, that the sale, lease, other transfer, or retention, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after the approval of the development or renewal plan by the governing body. The purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns must be obligated to devote the real property only to the uses specified in the development or renewal plan, and may be obligated to comply with any other requirements that the municipality determines are in the public interest, including the obligation to begin within a reasonable time any improvements on the real property required by the development or renewal plan. The real property or interest must be sold, leased, otherwise transferred, or retained at not less than its fair value for uses in accordance with the development or renewal plan. In determining the fair value of real property for uses in accordance with the development or renewal plan, a municipality shall take into account and give consideration to the uses provided in the plan; the restrictions upon, and the covenants, conditions, and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee or by the municipality retaining the property; and the objectives of the plan for the development of industrial or commercial properties and the prevention of the recurrence of slum or blighted areas. The municipality in any instrument of conveyance to a private purchaser or lessee may provide that the purchaser or lessee may not sell, lease, or otherwise transfer the real property without the prior written consent of the municipality until the purchaser or lessee has completed the construction of any and all improvements which the purchaser or lessee is obligated to construct on the real property. Real property acquired by a municipality which, in accordance with the provisions of the development or renewal plan, is to be transferred, must be transferred as rapidly as feasible in the public interest consistent with the carrying out of the provisions of the development or renewal plan. The inclusion in any contract or conveyance to a purchaser or lessee of any such covenants, restrictions, or conditions, including the incorporation by reference of the provisions of a development or renewal plan or any part of the plan, does not prevent the filing of the contract or conveyance in the land records of the recorder in a manner that affords actual or constructive notice of the contract or conveyance.

A municipality may dispose of real property in a development or renewal area to private persons in a manner that appropriately carries out the purposes and provisions of this chapter. Thereafter, the municipality may execute the contract in accordance with the provisions of subsection 1 and deliver deeds, leases, and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate the contract.

A municipality may temporarily operate and maintain real property acquired in a development or renewal area pending the disposition of the property for development or redevelopment, without regard to the provisions of subsection 1, for any uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with the development or renewal plan.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 9; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5809; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 10; 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

40-58-10.
Issuance of bonds.

A municipality may issue bonds from time to time in its discretion to finance the undertaking of any development or renewal project, including the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for surveys and plans for development or renewal projects, and may issue refunding bonds for the payment or retirement of bonds previously issued by it. The bonds must be made payable, as to both principal and interest, solely from the income, proceeds, revenues, and funds of the municipality derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and carrying out of development or renewal projects; provided, however, that the payment of bonds, both as to principal and interest, may be further secured by a pledge of any loan, grant, or contribution from the federal government or other source, in aid of any development or renewal projects of the municipality, and by a mortgage of all or any part of a development or renewal project, title to which is in the municipality.

Bonds issued under this section do not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction, and are not subject to any other law or charter relating to the authorization, issuance, or sale of bonds. Bonds issued under this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest and income, are exempt from all taxation.

Bonds issued under this section must be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the governing body and may be issued in one or more series and must bear such date or dates, be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, resulting in an average annual net interest cost not exceeding twelve per centum per annum on those issues which are sold at private sale. The bonds must be in such denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such places, and be subject to such terms of redemption with or without premium, be secured in such manner, and have such other characteristics, as may be provided by the resolution or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant to the resolution.

The bonds may be sold at not less than par at public sales held after notice published prior to the sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation and in any other medium of publication as the municipality may determine or may be exchanged for other bonds on the basis of par; provided, that the bonds may be sold to the federal government at private sale at not less than par, and, in the event less than all of the authorized principal amount of the bonds is sold to the federal government, the balance may be sold at private sale at not less than par at an interest cost to the municipality of not to exceed the interest cost to the municipality of the portion of the bonds sold to the federal government. The bonds may also be sold at private sale if the obligations do not exceed the total sum of one hundred thousand dollars. There is no interest rate ceiling on issues sold at public sale or to the state of North Dakota or any of its agencies or instrumentalities.

If a public official of the municipality whose signature appears on any bonds or coupons issued under this chapter ceases to be a public official before the delivery of the bonds, the signature is, nevertheless, valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if the official had remained in office until the delivery. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter are fully negotiable.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this chapter or the security for the bond, any bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the municipality in connection with a development or renewal project is conclusively deemed to have been issued for that purpose and the project is conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 10; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5810; S.L. 1971, ch. 249, § 22; 1981, ch. 269, § 20; 1989, ch. 499, § 11.

40-58-11.
Bonds as legal investments.

All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking or investment business and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any sinking funds, moneys, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality pursuant to this chapter or by any urban renewal agency or housing authority vested with urban renewal project powers under section 40-58-15. However, the bonds and other obligations must be secured by an agreement between the issuer and the federal government in which the issuer agrees to borrow from the federal government and the federal government agrees to lend to the issuer, prior to the maturity of the bonds or other obligations, moneys in an amount which together with any other moneys irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on the bonds or other obligations will suffice to pay the principal of such bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity thereon, which moneys under the terms of the agreement are required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on the bonds or other obligations at their maturity. The bonds and other obligations are authorized security for all public deposits. This section does not relieve any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 11; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5811; S.L. 1983, ch. 319, § 29.

40-58-12.
Property exempt from taxes and from levy and sale by virtue of an execution.

All property of a municipality, including funds, owned or held by it for the purposes of this chapter is exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process may issue against the same nor may judgment against a municipality be a charge or lien upon the property; provided, however, that the provisions of this section do not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given pursuant to this chapter by a municipality on its rents, fees, grants, or revenues from development or renewal projects.

The property of a municipality, acquired or held for the purposes of this chapter, is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and the property is exempt from all taxes of the municipality, the county, the state, or any political subdivision of the state; provided, that this tax exemption terminates when the municipality sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of the property in a development or renewal area to a purchaser or lessee which is not a public body entitled to tax exemption with respect to the property.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 12; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5812; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 12.